tests/epentheticV.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "[twol] verb with epenthetic vowel realised":
    қорық<v><iv><ifi><p1><sg> : қорықтым
    қорық<v><iv><past><p1><sg> : қорыққанмын

  "[twol] verb with epenthetic vowel unrealised":
    қорық<v><iv><ger><nom> : қорқу
    қорық<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : қорқамын

  "[twol] nouns with epenthetic vowel unrealised":
    мұрын<n><px1sg><nom> : мұрным
    мұрын<n><px3sp><gen> : мұрнының
    мүлік<n><px1sg><nom> : мүлкім
    мүлік<n><px3sp><gen> : мүлкінің

  "[twol] noun with epenthetic back vowel realised":
    мұрын<n><nom> : мұрын
    мұрын<n><gen> : мұрынның

  "[twol] noun with epenthetic front vowel realised":
    мүлік<n><nom> : мүлік
    мүлік<n><gen> : мүліктің

  "[twol] noun with forced front-vowel realised":
    қауіп<n><px3sp><nom> : қаупі
    қауіп<n><nom> : қауіп
